Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.819

Review of enforcement actions under the Washington my health my data act—Report. (Expires June 30, 2031.)

(1) The joint committee must review enforcement actions, as authorized in RCW 19.373.090, brought by the attorney general and consumers to enforce violations of chapter 191, Laws of 2023.

(2) The report must include, at a minimum:

(a) The number of enforcement actions reported by the attorney general, a consumer, a regulated entity, or a small business that resulted in a settlement, including the average settlement amount;

(b) The number of complaints reported, including categories of complaints and the number of complaints for each category, reported by the attorney general, a consumer, a regulated entity, or a small business;

(c) The number of enforcement actions brought by the attorney general and consumers, including the categories of violations and the number of violations per category;

(e) [(d)] The number of civil actions where a judge determined the position of the nonprevailing party was frivolous, if any;

(f) [(e)] The types of resources, including associated costs, expended by the attorney general, a consumer, a regulated entity, or a small business for enforcement actions; and

(g) [(f)] Recommendations for potential changes to enforcement provisions of chapter 191, Laws of 2023.

(3) The office of the attorney general shall provide the joint committee any data within their purview that the joint committee considers necessary to conduct the review.

(4) The joint committee shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2030.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2031.

[ 2023 c 191 s 13.]